Washington statutes.
RCW 36.34.060

Sales of personalty.

Sales of personal property must be for cash except when:

(1) A public auction sale by electronic media is conducted pursuant to RCW 36.16.145;

(2) Property is transferred to a governmental agency; or

(3) The county property is to be traded in on the purchase of a like article, in which case the proposed cash allowance for the trade-in must be part of the proposition to be submitted by the seller in the transaction.

[ 2015 c 95 s 4; 1963 c 4 s 36.34.060. Prior: 1945 c 254 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 4014-5; prior: 1915 c 8 s 1, part; 1891 c 76 s 5, part; RRS s 4011, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—2015 c 95: See note following RCW 36.16.145.